Illinois, session 104th, HB4575.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 17-139 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/17-139)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 17-139)7    Sec. 17-139. Board elections and vacancies. 8    (1) Contributors other than administrators election. Every 9member who is not an administrator may vote at the election for 10as many persons as there are trustees to be elected by the 11contributors who are not administrators, provided that the 12contributor obtained that voter eligibility status on or 13before October 1 of the election year. The name of a candidate 14shall not be placed on the ballot unless he or she has been 15assigned on a regular certificate for at least 10 years in the 16Chicago public schools or charter schools and nominated by a 17petition signed by not less than 200 contributors who are not 18administrators.19    Petitions shall be filed with the recording secretary of 20the Fund on or before after September 15 of each year and not 21later than October 1st of the election that year. No more than 22one candidate may be nominated by any one petition. If the 23nominations do not exceed the number of candidates to be   HB4575 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19107 RPS 32552 b1elected, the canvassing board shall declare the nominated 2candidates elected. Otherwise, candidates receiving the 3highest number of votes cast for their respective terms shall 4be declared elected. The location and number of polling places 5shall be designated by the Board.6    Elections to fill vacancies on the Board shall be held at 7the next annual election.8    (2) Pensioners election. The name of a candidate shall not 9be placed on the ballot unless he or she has been nominated by 10a petition signed by not less than 100 pensioners of the Fund. 11Petitions shall be filed with the recording secretary of the 12Fund on or before October 1 of the odd-numbered year. If the 13nominations do not exceed 3, the mailing of ballots shall be 14eliminated and the nominated candidates shall be declared 15elected. Otherwise, the 3 candidates receiving the highest 16number of votes cast shall be declared elected.17    (3) Administrators election. The name of a candidate shall 18not be placed on the ballot unless he or she has been nominated 19by a petition signed by at least 25 contributors who are 20administrators. Petitions shall be filed with the recording 21secretary of the Fund on or before October 1 of the election 22year. Every member who is an administrator may vote at the 23election for one candidate who is a contributor who is an 24administrator, provided that the member obtained such voter 25eligibility status on or before October 1 of the election 26year. If only one eligible candidate is nominated, the   HB4575 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19107 RPS 32552 b1election shall not be held and the nominated candidate shall 2be declared elected. Otherwise, the candidate receiving the 3highest number of votes cast shall be declared elected.4    (4) Vacancies. The Board may fill vacancies occurring in 5the membership of the Board elected by the administrators, 6teachers other than administrators, or pensioners at any 7regular meeting of the Board. The Board of Education may fill 8vacancies occurring in the membership of the Board appointed 9by the Board of Education at any regular meeting of the Board 10of Education.11(Source: P.A. 98-449, eff. 8-16-13.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.